Utah statutes.
41-22-20.   Public land administrating agencies to develop facilities and programs.

All public land administering agencies are encouraged:

(1)  to develop and maintain trails, parking areas, rest rooms, and other related facilities appropriate to off-highway vehicle use; and

(2)  to promote the safety, enjoyment, and responsible use of all forms of this recreational activity.



Amended by Chapter 363, 1997 General Session

